Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 62 of Title 41, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A landlord may charge a tenant who has a pet the following:
1. A pet deposit: Which is a deposit that covers actual
damages caused by an animal. The deposit shall be:
a. refundable;
b. a one-time payment;
c. damage-based, meaning if the damages does not exceed
the deposit amount the unused portion of the deposit
shall be refunded to the tenant; and
d. held in escrow.
Req. No. 15758 Page 1

2. Pet Fee: A pet fee shall be:
a. nonrefundable:
b. a one-time payment charged solely because a pet will
live on the leased premises;
C. not tied to actual damages; and
D. not be charged in addition to pet deposit.
B. A landlord may not charge pet rent. Pet rent is a recurring
payment for having a pet on the leased premises.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15758 JL 01/05/26













Req. No. 15758 Page 2